New York, session 2025-2026, A5840.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 3 of section 2803-u of the public health law, 2 as added by section 1 of part C of chapter 70 of the laws of 2016, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 3. (a) Upon commencement of treatment, admission, or discharge of an 5 individual with a documented substance use disorder or who appears to 6 have or be at risk for a substance use disorder, including discharge 7 from the emergency department, such hospital shall inform the individual 8 of the availability of the substance use disorder treatment services 9 that may be available to them through a substance use disorder services 10 program. 11 (b) Upon discharge of an individual who appears to be at risk for a 12 substance use disorder, such hospital shall dispense at least two doses 13 of opioid reversal drugs. 14 § 2. Section 29.15 of the mental hygiene law is amended by adding a 15 new subdivision (o) to read as follows: 16 (o) Upon discharge from an inpatient facility operated or licensed by 17 the office of alcoholism and substance abuse services or the office of 18 mental health, a patient who appears to be at risk for a substance use 19 disorder shall be dispensed at least two doses of opioid reversal drugs. 20 § 3. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 21 it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07416-01-5